North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-16 Excess Levies in School Districts [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 457, § 12]

57-16-01.
Electors may exceed tax limitations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 457, § 12.

57-16-02.
Governing board may declare necessity. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 457, § 12.

57-16-03.
Election to be held — Notice. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 457, § 12.

57-16-04.
Increase may be for five years — Extension — Discontinuance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 457, § 12.

57-16-05.
Vote necessary for approval. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 608, § 22.

57-16-06.
Form of ballot. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 457, § 12.

57-16-07.
Certification of election results. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 457, § 12.